Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-313
Hunting, trapping, or molesting predatory animal on or from freeway; prohibited, exception; violation; penalty.

No person shall hunt, trap, or molest any predatory animal on or upon any portion of a freeway or approach or exit thereto except at locations designated for such purpose. No person shall shoot from the roadway onto or across the land of any farmer or landowner or kill, attempt to kill, or retrieve any wildlife or game on such land prior to receiving permission from such farmer or landowner. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 85;

Laws 1974, LB 699, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-685;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 37.

Shooting from highway prohibited, see section 37-513.